Utah statutes.
20A-3-406.   Absentee ballots for military personnel and citizens living
overseas -- Federal postcard applications for ballot.
(1) (a)  Applications for absentee ballots for military voters that are
located in the United States shall be filed in the county clerk's office no
later than the Friday immediately before the day of election.
(b)  Military personnel voting an absentee ballot at the office of the clerk
shall apply and cast their ballot no later than the day before the election.
(2) (a)  Military voters stationed overseas and overseas citizen voters shall
file an application for a ballot with the county clerk no later than 20 days
before the date of the election.
(b)  Upon receipt of a properly completed written application for an absentee
ballot signed by any military voter or overseas citizen voter, the county
clerk shall mail an appropriate ballot to the military voter or overseas
citizen voter.
(c)  The county clerk, at the time he furnishes the ballot, shall record, in a
record book provided for that purpose, the name and home address of the
military voter or overseas citizen voter to whom the ballot is mailed, the
address mailed to, and the date of mailing the ballot.
(d)  If the military voter or overseas citizen voter sends his application to
the lieutenant governor, the lieutenant governor shall forward the application
to the county clerk of the county where the military voter or overseas citizen
voter is entitled to vote.
(e)  If the county clerk rejects the application for an absentee ballot from a
military or overseas citizen voter, the county clerk shall inform the voter of
the reasons for rejecting the application.
(3)  Any military voter or overseas citizen voter who is physically disabled
so as to be unable to see or write may apply for a ballot by having a
commissioned, noncommissioned, or petty officer not below the rank of
sergeant, or other person authorized to administer oaths to apply for a ballot
on the voter's behalf.
(4) (a)  A federal postcard application issued under the authority of any Act
of Congress or federal regulation is acceptable, when properly executed, as an
application for a ballot under this chapter.
(b)  The county clerk shall accept the completed postcard application as an
application for ballots for each election for federal office held in the next
two even-numbered years and shall send the applicant a ballot for each of
those elections, as required by Section 20A-3-407.
(5)  The county clerk shall retain the application for use at the time the
ballot is received from the military voter or overseas citizen voter.
